Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Article 3. Debt Limitation and Bond Redemption

Cross references. —

For constitutional limitations on public indebtedness, see art. 16, §§ 1 through 5, Wyo. Const.

§ 16-5-301.
Voidness of excessive indebtedness; liability of officer and sureties.

Any indebtedness created by any county, city, town or other subdivision of the state in any current year in excess of that authorized by the constitution of the state and for which there are no revenues available for payment during the current year, shall as against the county, city, town or other subdivision of the state, be void and of no effect. Any officer who participates in creating the indebtedness, and the sureties on his official bond, is personally liable to the holder, or holders, of the indebtedness as fully as if the indebtedness had been contracted for his individual benefit. As used in this section, “current year” means from the first Monday in January of a year to the first Monday in January of the next year.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 89, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 2615; C.S. 1910, § 1353; C.S. 1920, § 1613; R.S. 1931, § 90-101; C.S. 1945, § 20-1201; W.S. 1957, § 9-624; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1501; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

§ 16-5-302.
Issuance of bonds in series; discharge.

Whenever the issuance of bonds by the state, or any county, city, town, school district or high school district, is lawful, the board or other public body having authority to issue the bonds may divide the issues into series so that:

Substantially equal amounts of the indebtedness mature annually;

Substantially equal annual tax levies are required for the payment of principal and interest of the bonds; or

Substantially equal annual tax levies are required for the payment of principal and interest of all outstanding bonds of the state or subdivision thereof issuing the bonds.

The bonds of each series shall be due and payable at a definite date within the period permitted by law for the discharge of the indebtedness.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 62, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 90-102; Laws 1939, ch. 57, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 20-1202; W.S. 1957, § 9-625; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1502; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to funding and refunding bonds in cities and towns generally, see chapter 8 of title 15.

As to issuance of county funding bonds in the manner prescribed by this section, see §

18-4-501

.

As to issuance of school district refunding bonds, see §

21-13-720

.

Applied

in

Jewett v. School Dist., 49 Wyo. 277, 54 P.2d 546,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(1936).

§ 16-5-303.
Redemption of bonds owned by state.

Any bond issued by any county, municipality, school district or other political subdivision of the state and which bond the state owns on any interest payment date, upon thirty (30) days written notice to the state treasurer of the state is subject to redemption on the date by the payment of the principal and interest then due on the bond to the treasurer. Redemption shall be made only from sinking funds of the political subdivisions and not from funds obtained by its refunding of the bonds.

History.

Laws 1941, ch. 4, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 20-1203; W.S. 1957, § 9-626; W.S. 1977, § 9-7-1503; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 2, ch. 4, Laws 1941, repeals all laws and parts of laws in conflict with that act.

Section inapplicable where provision for prior redemption.—

Where state-held bonds contain an express provision for their prior redemption, this section is inapplicable. Rodin v. State, 417 P.2d 180,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1966).